Utah statutes.
26-18-6.   Federal aid -- Authority of executive director.

The executive director, with the approval of the governor, may bind the state to any executive or legislative provisions promulgated or enacted by the federal government which invite the state to participate in the distribution, disbursement or administration of any fund or service advanced, offered or contributed in whole or in part by the federal government for purposes consistent with the powers and duties of the department. Such funds shall be used as provided in this chapter and be administered by the department for purposes related to medical assistance programs.

